trunk/apertium-tg-fa/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix.xml
    <pardef n="ب/ستن__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ندید</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ند</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ستیم</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ستم</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ستید</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ستی</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ستند</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ست</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ندیم</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ندم</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ندید</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ندی</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ندند</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ندد</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ندیم</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ندم</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ندید</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ندی</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ندند</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ندد</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="س/ودن__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ایید</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ا</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ودیم</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ودم</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ودید</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ودی</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ودند</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ود</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اییم</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ایم</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ایید</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ایی</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ایند</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اید</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اییم</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ایم</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ایید</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ایی</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ایند</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اید</l>
          <r>ودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ستودن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>ست</i><par n="س/ودن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ربودن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>رب</i><par n="س/ودن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="زدودن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>زد</i><par n="س/ودن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="سرودن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>سر</i><par n="س/ودن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پیوستن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>پیو</i><par n="ب/ستن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پیمودن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>پیم</i><par n="س/ودن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="گشودن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>گش</i><par n="س/ودن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="نمودن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>نم</i><par n="س/ودن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="بستن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>ب</i><par n="ب/ستن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فرمودن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>فرم</i><par n="س/ودن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="سودن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>س</i><par n="س/ودن__vblex"/></e>
